Washington statutes.
RCW 36.125.040

Application to committees established under federal law.

Nothing in RCW 36.125.010 or 36.125.020 is intended to expand or limit the authority of local marine resources committees established under the Northwest Straits marine conservation initiative by federal act in San Juan, Whatcom, Skagit, Island, Snohomish, Clallam, and Jefferson counties and existing as of July 22, 2007.

[ 2007 c 344 s 5.]